Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-2909.01
Disclosure; purposes authorized.

The department and any officer, employee, agent, or contractor of the department having custody of a motor vehicle record shall, upon the verification of identity and purpose of a requester, disclose and make available the requested motor vehicle record, including the sensitive personal information in the record, other than the social security number, for the following purposes:

(1) For use by any federal, state, or local governmental agency, including any court or law enforcement agency, in carrying out the agency's functions or by a private person or entity acting on behalf of a governmental agency in carrying out the agency's functions;

(2) For use in connection with any civil, criminal, administrative, or arbitral proceeding in any federal, state, or local court or governmental agency or before any self-regulatory body, including service of process, investigation in anticipation of litigation, and execution or enforcement of judgments and orders, or pursuant to an order of a federal, state, or local court, an administrative agency, or a self-regulatory body;

(3) For use by any insurer or insurance support organization, or by a self-insured entity, or its agents, employees, or contractors, in connection with claims investigation activities, anti-fraud activities, rating, or underwriting;

(4) For use by an employer or the employer's agent or insurer to obtain or verify information relating to a holder of a commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's permit that is required under the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986, 49 U.S.C. 31301 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2026, or pursuant to sections 60-4,132 and 60-4,141; and

(5) For use by employers of a holder of a commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's permit and by the Commercial Driver License Information System as provided in section 60-4,144.02 and 49 C.F.R. 383.73, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2026.

Laws 2000, LB 1317, § 14;

Laws 2011, LB178, § 20;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 59;

Laws 2019, LB79, § 21;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 74;

Laws 2021, LB149, § 20;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 74;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 49;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 58;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 55;

Laws 2026, LB781, § 8.
April 15, 2026